Washington statutes.
RCW 36.115.070

Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the legislature to permit the creation of a flexible process to establish service agreements and to recognize that local governments possess broad authority to shape a variety of government service agreements to meet their local needs and circumstances. However, it is noted that in general, cities are the unit of local government most appropriate to provide urban governmental services and counties are the unit of local government most appropriate to provide regional governmental services.

The process to establish service agreements should assure that all directly affected local governments, and Indian tribes at their option, are allowed to be heard on issues relevant to them.

[ 1994 c 266 s 7.]